Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-526
State Fire Marshal; investigations; duty of county attorney to act.

The county attorney of any county, upon request of the State Fire Marshal, or his or her deputies or assistants, shall (1) assist such officers in the investigation of any fire which, in their opinion, is of suspicious origin and (2) act as attorney for such officers in all court proceedings in connection with the enforcement of the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act when, in the exercise of a reasonable discretion, the county attorney shall determine that the evidence is sufficient to justify the bringing of such court proceedings.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 25, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 81-5525;

R.S.1943, § 81-526;

Laws 1945, c. 228, § 1, p. 675;

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB371, § 1.

Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act, see section 81-15,117.